Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-352
Watercourses; cleaning and changing.

In order to effect the drainage of the district, the board is authorized to clean out and remove all obstructions from the bed of any stream, creek, bayou, lagoon or other watercourse in the district; to straighten or shorten and deepen or widen the course of any stream or to abandon the bed of any stream and construct a new channel therefor; and to fill up any channel, or part of a channel, of any stream, creek, bayou, or other watercourse, in order to turn the direction of the volume of water, or to concentrate the water, so as to deepen and form a main channel.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 23, p. 628;

R.S.1913, § 1847;

C.S.1922, § 1794;

C.S.1929, § 31-451;

R.S.1943, § 31-352.

Drainage district may be required to construct bridge occasioned by reason of failure to keep its drainage system in repair. Ritter v. Drainage Dist. No. 1, 148 Neb. 873, 29 N.W.2d 782 (1947).

Right of supervisors to keep drainage ditch in repair includes the right to straighten its channel or lengthen and better its outlet. Richardson County v. Drainage District No. 1 of Richardson County, 113 Neb. 662, 204 N.W. 376 (1925).